District of Columbia statutes.
7-3012

Infrastructure development plan.

Within 180 days after July 18, 2000, APRA shall establish a comprehensive plan to develop the District’s substance abuse treatment and prevention infrastructure. This plan shall be based on a rigorous needs assessment and current service inventory to identify gaps in treatment modalities by geographic location.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 13, 47 DCR 4350